test/src/morphology/N-koiru_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - koiru: # Noun 'dog / koira' - full paradigm
     koiru+N+Sg+Nom: koiru
     koiru+N+Sg+Gen: koiran
     koiru+N+Sg+Acc: [koiru, koiran]
     koiru+N+Sg+Par: koirua
     koiru+N+Sg+Tra: koirakse
     koiru+N+Sg+Abe: [koiratta, koirata, koirattah]
     koiru+N+Sg+Com: koiranke
     koiru+N+Sg+Ine: koiras
     koiru+N+Sg+Ela: [koiraspäi, koiras]
     koiru+N+Sg+Ill: koirah
     koiru+N+Sg+Ade: koiral
     koiru+N+Sg+Abl: [koiralpäi, koiral]
     koiru+N+Sg+All: koirale
     koiru+N+Sg+Ess: koirannu
     koiru+N+Sg+Ter: koirassah
     koiru+N+Sg+Apr: koiralluo
     koiru+N+Pl+Nom: koirat
     koiru+N+Pl+Gen: koirien
     koiru+N+Pl+Acc: koirat
     koiru+N+Pl+Par: koirii
     koiru+N+Pl+Tra: koirikse
     koiru+N+Pl+Abe: [koiritta, koirita, koirittah]
     koiru+N+Pl+Com: koirienke
     koiru+N+Pl+Ine: koiris
     koiru+N+Pl+Ela: [koirispäi, koiris]
     koiru+N+Pl+Ill: koirihe
     koiru+N+Pl+Ade: koiril
     koiru+N+Pl+Abl: [koirilpäi, koiril]
     koiru+N+Pl+All: koirile
     koiru+N+Pl+Ess: koirinnu
     koiru+N+Pl+Ins: koirin
     koiru+N+Pl+Apr: koirilluo
     koiru+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: koirugi
     koiru+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: koirangi
     koiru+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [koirugi, koirangi]
     koiru+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: koiruagi
     koiru+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: koiraksegi
     koiru+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [koirattagi, koiratagi, koirattahgi]
     koiru+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: koirankegi
     koiru+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: koirasgi
     koiru+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [koiraspäigi, koirasgi]
     koiru+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: koirahgi
     koiru+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: koiralgi
     koiru+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [koiralpäigi, koiralgi]
     koiru+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: koiralegi
     koiru+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: koirannugi
     koiru+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: koirassahgi
     koiru+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: koiralluogi
     koiru+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: koiratgi
     koiru+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: koiriengi
     koiru+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: koiratgi
     koiru+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: koiriigi
     koiru+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: koiriksegi
     koiru+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [koirittagi, koiritagi, koirittahgi]
     koiru+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: koirienkegi
     koiru+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: koirisgi
     koiru+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [koirispäigi, koirisgi]
     koiru+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: koirihegi
     koiru+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: koirilgi
     koiru+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [koirilpäigi, koirilgi]
     koiru+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: koirilegi
     koiru+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: koirinnugi
     koiru+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: koiringi
     koiru+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: koirilluogi
